Washington statutes.
RCW 18.300.080

Notice to consumers.

The director shall prepare and provide to all licensed shops or businesses a notice to consumers. At a minimum, the notice must state that body art, body piercing, and tattooing shops or businesses are required to be licensed, that shops or businesses are required to maintain minimum safety and sanitation standards, that customer complaints regarding shops or businesses may be reported to the department, and a telephone number and address where complaints may be made.

[ 2009 c 412 s 9.]